District of Columbia statutes.
16-2334

Fingerprint records.

(a)

The contents or existence of law enforcement records and files of the fingerprints of a child shall not be disclosed by the custodians thereof, except—

(1)

to a law enforcement officer of the United States, the District of Columbia, or other jurisdiction for purposes of the investigation and trial of a criminal offense; or

(2)

pursuant to rule or special order of the court.

(b)

When a child is transferred for criminal prosecution under section 16-2307, law enforcement records and files of his fingerprints relating to any matter so transferred shall be deemed those of an adult.

(c)

No person shall disclose, inspect, or use records in violation of this section.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 542, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2334.
1973 Ed., § 16-2334.